Utah statutes.
72-1-211.   Department to develop strategic initiatives -- Report --
Rulemaking.
(1)  The executive director shall develop strategic initiatives for the
department.
(2)  The strategic initiatives developed under Subsection (1) shall include
consideration of the following factors:
(a)  corridor preservation;
(b)  development of new transportation capacity projects;
(c)  long-term maintenance and operations of the transportation system;
(d)  safety;
(e)  incident management; and
(f)  homeland security.
(3) (a)  The executive director or the executive director's designee shall
report the strategic initiatives of the department developed under Subsection
(1) to the Transportation Commission.
(b)  The report required under Subsection (3)(a) shall include the measure
that will be used to determine whether the strategic initiatives have been
achieved.
(4)  After compliance with Subsection (3) and in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules
establishing the strategic initiatives developed under this part.
